District of Columbia statutes.
6-1062.04

Office of Planning.

The Developer shall work with the Office of Planning and other appropriate agencies prior to and during the zoning process to ensure that the District’s planning and other policy objectives and goals, to the extent that the project is not jeopardized financially, are achieved to the fullest extent possible.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-278, § 204, 54 DCR 895